Tennessee, session 114, SB0936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 50, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
It is the policy of this state that there are only two (2) sexes, a biological male and
a biological female.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0936
002203
- 1 -